Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska50-108
Contempt; fines and imprisonment; how effected.

Fines and imprisonment shall be only by virtue of an order of the Legislature, entered on its journal stating the grounds therefor. Imprisonment shall be effected by a warrant, under the hand of the presiding officer for the time being, countersigned by the Clerk of the Legislature, running in the name of the state and directed to the sheriff of the proper county. Under such warrant, the officer of the Legislature, sheriff, and jailer will be authorized to arrest and detain the person.

R.S.1866, c. 31, § 10, p. 250;

R.S.1913, § 3749;

C.S.1922, § 3142;

C.S.1929, § 50-108;

R.S.1943, § 50-108.